Massachusetts, session 194th, H2600.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 2Q following new section:-
“Section 2R. There shall be established and set up on the books of the Commonwealth a
PFAS Research and Development Public Safety Fund. The secretary of public safety and
security shall administer the fund. The fund shall consist of amounts credited to the fund from:
(i) any appropriations, grants, gifts or other money authorized by the general court or other
parties and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; and (ii) any income derived from
the investment of amounts credited to the fund. Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end
of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure in the
subsequent fiscal year. Amounts credited to the fund may be expended, without further
appropriation, by the secretary on related programs, grants and costs. Such fund shall be used to
support the development, testing and purchasing of a PFAS-free Firefighter Turnout Gear
of 2

moisture barrier material and design that meet or exceed current NFPA standards without
compromising protection or performance and the development and testing of other new materials
and designs for turnout gear that reduce the inherent dangers firefighters face, including but not
limited to: enhanced protection against primary and secondary exposure to particulates and
byproducts of combustion, and reduced maintenance that includes contamination resistance and
greater ease of cleaning for any new technical fabrics or designs.”
of 2